Missouri, session 2026, SB1618.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 526.010 as enacted by senate bill no.
22, one hundred third general assembly, first regular session,
and section 526.010 as enacted by senate bill no. 1211, ninety-
second general assembly, second regular session, are repealed
and one new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
section 526.010, to read as follows:
[526.010. 1. Injunctions may be granted
by a circuit judge or an associate circuit judge.
2. In any action in which the state or a
statewide official is preliminarily enjoined
from implementing, enforcing, or otherwise
effectuating any provision of the Constitution
of Missouri, any Missouri statute, or any
Missouri regulation, the attorney general may
appeal the preliminary injunction.
3. The attorney general may appeal any
preliminary injunction that existed prior to
August 28, 2025, under subsection 2 of this
section.]
526.010. 1. Injunctions may be granted by a circuit
judge[,] or an associate circuit judge.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1618 2
2. In any action in which a circuit judge or associate
circuit judge preliminarily enjoins any party to that
action, the party enjoined by the preliminary injunction may
appeal the grant of the preliminary injunction.
✓